Vermont, session 2025-2026, H406.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FINDINGS
(a) The process of naming State buildings and facilities is inherently
influenced by the politics of the day.
(b) The General Assembly has sought to delegate its responsibility to name
State buildings and facilities to an administrative committee through the
creation of the State Building Naming Study Committee in 2024 Acts and
Resolves No. 162, Sec. 21, but that legislation has met resistance and the
implementation of the Committee has been administratively onerous.
(c) Recent requests to name State buildings within the Capitol Complex
have raised concerns about setting a precedent that could lead to further
constituent-driven proposals, creating a burdensome and contentious process.
VT LEG #381022 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.406
2025 Page 2 of 2
(d) Historical inequities have prevented individuals from marginalized
communities from achieving the level of recognition typically required for
consideration in the naming process. To date, all State buildings named after
individuals have been named exclusively after White men.
(e) The General Assembly finds that the process of naming State buildings
and facilities is fraught with challenges, including political influence,
inequitable representation, and administrative burden. To address these
concerns, the General Assembly enacts this legislation prohibiting naming
State buildings or facilities after individuals.
Sec. 2. 29 V.S.A. § 820 is amended to read:
§ 820. THE NAMING OF STATE BUILDINGS AND FACILITIES
(a) Except for State transportation buildings and facilities named by the
Transportation Board in accordance with 19 V.S.A. § 5, the name by which a
State building or facility is to be known shall be authorized by the General
Assembly.
(b) The General Assembly shall not authorize any request to name a State
building or facility after an individual that has not been formally approved by
the General Assembly on or before July 1, 2025.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #381022 v.1